District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.44

Contract rights of officers.

(a)

The appointment of an officer shall not itself create contract rights.

(b)

An officer’s removal shall not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation shall not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720